Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2019
Temporary educational permit, defined.

Temporary educational permit means a permit to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or any of their allied specialties in graduate medical education, a fellowship, or a refresher course.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 677.